Utah statutes.
53-3-904.   Instructor training and approval.

(1)  The program coordinator shall approve instructors for the motorcycle rider training courses.

(2)  A person may not be approved as an instructor unless the person holds a current instructor certification issued by the Motorcycle Safety Foundation or another nationally recognized motorcycle safety instructor certifying body.

(3) (a)  The program shall include instructor training courses as necessary.

(b)  Prior to completion of an instructor training course, the participant shall demonstrate:

(i)  knowledge of the course material;

(ii)  knowledge of proper motorcycle operation;

(iii)  proficiency in riding motorcycles; and

(iv)  the necessary aptitude for instructing students.

(4)  An applicant for an instructor training course shall:

(a)  have a high school diploma or its equivalent;

(b)  be at least 18 years of age;

(c)  have a valid endorsement to his driver's license for motorcycles; and

(d)  have at least two years of recent motorcycle riding experience.

(5)  The division shall refuse to certify or revoke certification of an instructor if the applicant:

(a)  has had his driver's license suspended or revoked during the preceding two years or within the preceding five years if the suspension or revocation was for an alcohol or drug-related offense;

(b)  fails to successfully complete an instructor course or required course updates; or

(c)  no longer meets the requirements of this section.

